California statutes. Education Code
(5) Except for cases of complaints related to paragraph (2), for those complaints that are filed directly with the department under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and the department determines merit direct intervention, the department shall complete an investigation and provide a written decision to the complainant within 60 days of receipt of the complaint, unless the parties have agreed to extend the timeline or the department documents exceptional circumstances and informs the complainant.

(6) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, filed under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter
 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, the local educational agency shall take corrective actions consistent with the requirements of existing law that will provide a remedy to the affected pupil, or, in the case of complaints related to subparagraphs (I), (J), (K), and (L) of paragraph (1), to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians. For corrective actions related to subparagraph (I), remedies shall, where applicable, include reasonable efforts by the public school to ensure full reimbursement.

(7) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to pupils, parents and guardians, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The department may adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code to satisfy the requirements of this section. The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(c) Nothing in this section or those regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall prevent a local educational agency from using its local uniform complaint procedure to address complaints not listed in this section or those regulations.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” has the same meaning as in Section 4600 of Title 5 of the California Code of
 Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 665, Sec. 2.   (AB 3074)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33315.5.

(a) (1) Beginning July 1, 2026, upon receipt of a complaint that alleges unlawful discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying received by the department pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 33315, the Superintendent shall collect all of the following information:

(A) The self-identified protected group of the complainant, if voluntarily provided.

(B) A description of the complaint received.

(C) Any action taken by the department in response to the complaint and the timeline for that action.

(D) The disposition of the complaint.

(2) The data collected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be confidential and protected from public disclosure, including disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except that the information may be disclosable pursuant to that act to the same extent as the underlying complaint.

(b) (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall create and post on the department’s internet website a summary report of the information collected pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) The summary report shall not contain any personally identifying information about any individual, and the information in
 the report shall be sufficiently deidentified to prevent the identification of the individuals involved in the complaint. 

(c) The collection, publication, and transmission of data required by this section shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.   (AB 935)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33316.

The State Department of Education shall do all of the following:

(a) Revise and update budget manuals, forms and guidelines.

(b) Cooperate with federal and state agencies in prescribing rules and regulations, and instructions required by those agencies.

(c) Assess the needs and methods of collecting and disseminating financial information.

(d) Conduct workshops and conferences for the purpose of training school district and county personnel.

(e) Provide consultant services to colleges and universities on courses of instruction relative to school budgets and accounting practices.

(f) For purposes of Section 44421.5, report to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing the identity of any certificated person who knowingly and willfully reports false fiscal expenditure data relative to the conduct of any educational program. This requirement applies only if, in the course of his or her normal duties, a representative of the State Department of Education discovers information that gives him or her reasonable cause to believe that false fiscal expenditure data relative to the conduct of any educational program has been reported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 315, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

33317.

The Department of Education shall cooperate with the Educational Management and Evaluation Commission and shall as requested by the commission:

(a) Prepare and compile agenda items and research materials for the commission.

(b) Prepare and direct the execution of any provisions of agreements entered into by the commission for the formulation of a program budgeting and accounting system.

(c) Organize pilot projects for testing any program budgeting and accounting system.

(d) Recommend any change or revision of law necessary to effectuate any program budgeting and accounting system.

(e) Promote any program of budgeting and accounting system through cooperative working arrangements with interested public and private agencies and associations.

(f) Coordinate the budgeting and accounting activities of interested public and private agencies and associations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33317.3.

(a) Commencing with the 2026–27 school year, the department shall collect and publish on its internet website, and local educational agencies shall provide to the department, data on pupil transfers due to disciplinary reasons, including whether the pupil transferred to an alternative school based on a referral by the school.

(b) The department, when providing guidance on its internet website about reducing disproportionate discipline of pupil subgroups in schools, shall advise local educational agencies against the use of transfers to avoid reporting suspensions and expulsions.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office
 of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.   (AB 1984)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33317.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall provide a report of public school pupil enrollment information, to be known as the “California raw class size data report,” in order for the public to easily determine all of the following data:

(1) The average class size in each self-contained and departmentalized
 class for each schoolsite in every local educational agency from transitional kindergarten through all elementary school grades.

(2) The average class size in each self-contained and departmentalized class for each schoolsite in every local educational agency for each middle school grade.

(3) The average class size in each self-contained and departmentalized class for each schoolsite in every local educational
 agency for each high school grade.

(b) The report described in subdivision (a) shall be published annually and publicly available on the department’s internet website.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Average class size” means the total course enrollment divided by the number of classes.

 (2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 614, Sec. 2.   (SB 872)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33318.

(a) The Department of Education shall report the test results of all state-mandated testing programs to the individual school districts by not later than September 15th following the testing.

(b) The district superintendent may publicly report the results of a state-mandated testing program as they affect the district at the first regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the district after the statewide results have been presented to the State Board of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

33318.2.

(a) The department shall, on or before March 1, 2025, and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, provide a report to the Superintendent, the Governor, and the Legislature on the number and types of reports that local educational agencies are required to annually submit. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) Information on each type of report, including if the report is required by a particular program.

(2) The purpose of each report.

(3) Recommendations for both of the following:

(A) Which reports can be consolidated or eliminated to
 reduce the total number of reports local educational agencies are required to annually complete.

(B) Which reports can be truncated to shorten any reports local educational agencies are required to annually complete.

(C) In determining recommendations pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), the department shall seek voluntary input from a diverse array of local educational agencies that vary in size, type, geographic location, and pupil and staff demographics.

(b) Within 30 days of receiving a report from the department pursuant to subdivision (a), the Assembly and Senate Education committees, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and any other relevant subcommittees are encouraged to hold a hearing to allow for the Superintendent to present the report.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the information collected for reports pursuant to this section will help alleviate future burdens and costs on local educational agencies.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.   (SB 374)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33318.5.

(a) In addition to the dropout rate the department compiles pursuant to the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114–95), the department shall compile an attrition rate for high school pupils in the state pursuant to the formula specified in subdivision (b).

(b) The attrition rate is the difference between the number of pupils who enrolled in grade 9 in a particular year and the number of pupils who, four years later, receive a diploma of graduation from high school, divided by the number of pupils who enrolled in grade 9 in the particular year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 7.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33319.

The State Department of Education shall encourage and assist school districts to improve and monitor the health of their pupils. The department shall provide guidance and assist school districts to secure the voluntary assistance of local health professionals, schools of medicine, schools of public health, schools of nursing, voluntary health agencies, and other appropriate entities in order to provide pupil health screening and appropriate medical referrals as well as to provide valuable health information to pupils and their parents. The department shall encourage school districts to contact and cooperate with the State Maternal, Child, and Adolescent Health Board, with local maternal, child, and adolescent health boards, and child health and disability prevention programs established pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

As part of this assistance, the State Department of Education shall provide information and guidance to schools that request the information and guidance, to establish “Health Days” in order to provide screenings for common health problems among pupils as well as to provide information to pupils and parents on prevention of illness, proper nutrition, and other aspects of good health. The Health Days should be organized and staffed by school nurses working in cooperation with volunteers from schools of medicine, schools of public health, schools of nursing, voluntary health agencies, health professionals, local maternal, child, and adolescent health boards, and other appropriate entities. All medical screenings and services conducted pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 49400) of Part 27.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 35.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

33319.3.

The State Department of Education shall prepare materials on driver attitude and motivation that focus on the reduction of driving violations with particular emphasis on aggressive driving behavior and behavior commonly known as “road rage” and shall make these materials available to school districts to use in connection with programs of automobile driving education, at the option of the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 642, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

33319.5.

The State Department of Education may encourage among school districts, county boards of education, and county superintendents of schools the implementation of the authority granted to those agencies by Section 35160, including the rendering to those agencies, upon request, advisory opinions on whether a program, activity, or course of action is authorized by Section 35160. The department may publish and disseminate those opinions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

33319.6.

(a) No later than September 30, 2026, the state board shall approve and the department shall post on its internet website criteria and guidance for the selection or development of inservice professional development programs for effective means of teaching literacy in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 5, inclusive, with a list of inservice professional development programs that have been deemed to meet those criteria. Professional development programs that meet the criteria and guidance may be used by local educational agencies for training certificated and classified staff who provide literacy instruction or who support any teacher who provides literacy instruction. The list shall include programs offered in different modalities, including in-person and virtual formats, and the criteria and guidance
 shall ensure that programs follow the precepts of effective professional development; are content focused, interactive, and collaborative; provide models of effective practice, coaching, and opportunities for feedback and reflection; provide adequate time to master the concepts being taught; and include periodic checks to demonstrate mastery of the concepts. The criteria and guidance shall also ensure that the programs meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Include the requirements described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 and evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills, which shall include explicit and systematic instruction in print concepts, phonological awareness, phonics and word recognition, and fluency, attending to oral language development, vocabulary and background knowledge, and comprehension, including tiered supports for pupils with reading difficulties, English
 learners, and pupils with exceptional needs.

(2) Align to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing’s current teaching performance expectations as specified in Section 44259.7.

(3) Align to the English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework, including integrated and designated English language development instruction adopted by the state board.

(4) Align to the program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335.

(b) The state board and department shall solicit interestholder input when developing the criteria, guidance, and list of professional development programs pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The department, before incurring substantial costs for the review of professional development programs, shall require that a professional development program provider that intends to submit materials for review to first declare their intent to submit one or more professional development programs for review. After a professional development program provider has declared their intent to submit one or more professional development programs for review, and until September 30, 2026, the department may assess a fee on the submitting professional development program provider in an amount, consistent with paragraph (3), that shall not exceed the reasonable costs to the department to conduct a review of the submitted materials pursuant to this section, excluding the review of professional development programs submitted from local educational agencies described in paragraph (7).

(2) The fee shall be payable by the professional development program provider even if the professional development provider subsequently chooses to withdraw one or more professional development programs from review. A submission by a professional development program provider shall not be reviewed until the fee has been paid in full.

(3) The fee assessed shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each professional development program submitted for review. The department shall take reasonable steps to limit costs of the review and to keep the fee modest. It is the intent of the Legislature that the fee not be so substantial that it prevents small professional development program providers from participating.

(4) Upon the request of a small professional development program provider, the department may reduce the fee.

(5) The fees to be charged shall be approved by the executive director of the state board before being publicly posted on the department’s internet website.

(6) Revenue derived from fees assessed pursuant to this subdivision shall be budgeted as reimbursements, subject to review through the annual budget process, and may be used to pay for costs associated with the review and approval of professional development programs.

(7) Local educational agencies that submit professional development programs for review, either as a standalone professional development program provider or in a partnership that includes only local educational agencies, shall be exempt from paying the fee authorized pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) (1) (A) The department shall make funding available for purposes of training certificated and classified staff who provide literacy instruction, or who support any teacher who provides literacy instruction, to pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5, inclusive, using the professional development programs that meet the criteria and guidance approved pursuant to subdivision (a). The Superintendent shall apportion these funds to local educational agencies in an equal amount per full-time equivalent certificated staff who teach pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5,
 inclusive, using the data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System as of October 2025.

(B) A local educational agency may expend the funds received pursuant to this subdivision from the 2026–27 fiscal year to the 2029–30 fiscal year, inclusive. A local educational agency shall ensure that teachers and all other certificated employees complete training offered pursuant to this section on paid time during the employees’ regular work hours or designated professional development hours unless otherwise negotiated and mutually agreed upon with the employees’ exclusive representative.

(2) (A) (i) If a local educational agency is apportioned funds pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), those funds shall be used to provide opportunities for professional
 development for teachers who teach pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5, inclusive, who have not passed the literacy performance assessment pursuant to Section 44320.3 or have not already received training in a preservice or inservice program that aligns to the criteria specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and the criteria and guidance approved pursuant to subdivision (a), using one or more of the professional development programs approved pursuant to subdivision (a), except as provided in clause (ii).

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), if a local educational agency is apportioned funds pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), those funds may be used to provide opportunities for professional development using a professional development program not approved pursuant to subdivision (a), provided that the program aligns to the criteria specified in paragraphs (1) to (4),
 inclusive, of subdivision (a) and the criteria and guidance approved pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) If there are remaining funds after complying with subparagraph (A), a local educational agency may provide opportunities for professional development for teachers who teach pupils in grades other than transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5, inclusive, as well as opportunities for additional professional development for teachers who teach pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 5, inclusive, who have passed the literacy performance assessment pursuant to Section 44320.3 or already received training in a preservice or inservice program that aligns to the criteria specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and the criteria and guidance approved pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) As a condition of
 receiving funds apportioned pursuant to this subdivision, a local educational agency shall, on or before September 1, 2029, report to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, the number of teachers that received professional development and which professional development program was used at the local educational agency and schoolsite level.

(4) The department shall summarize the information reported pursuant to paragraph (3) and shall submit the summary to the appropriate budget subcommittees and policy committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Department of Finance on or before February 1, 2030.

(e) For purposes of this section,
 the following definitions apply:

 (1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.

(2) “Small professional development program provider” means an independently owned or operated professional development program provider that, together with its affiliates, has 20 or fewer employees, and has average annual gross receipts of two million dollars ($2,000,000) or less over the previous three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 744, Sec. 1.   (SB 147)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Effective Educational Programs and Practices [33320. - 33328.5.]

33320.

(a) The purpose of this article is to identify, develop, validate, and disseminate effective educational programs and practices operated by state and local educational entities, in order to improve the educational services provided through public elementary and secondary schools to persons between 3 and 21 years of age.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any state funding under this article not supplant any educational program funding that would otherwise be allocated to any school district, county office of education, or public postsecondary education institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33321.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish procedures within the State Department of Education to accomplish all of the following:

(a) Annually identify the critical needs for which effective educational programs and practices are to be identified, developed, and disseminated to public schools.

(b) Coordinate the identification and development of effective programs and practices with appropriate offices in the State Department of Education, schools, school districts, county offices of education, institutions of higher education, the Legislature, business and industry, and the community.

(c) Ensure that all programs developed under this article are objectively evaluated for impact on pupil learning, cost effectiveness, and the overall instructional program.

(d) Develop and implement procedures to ensure that educators throughout the state are made aware of the effective programs and practices identified under this article.

(e) Periodically prepare and report information about project results to the Legislative Analyst.

(f) Identify and coordinate appropriate federal and private funding to support the development and dissemination of projects and programs identified under this article.

(g) Establish, where appropriate, project partnerships with other public and private agencies, including business and industry, for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33321.5.

In performing the responsibilities set forth in Section 33321, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall consult with high school and elementary school teachers, high school and junior high school principals, school district administrators, members of school district governing boards, county superintendents of schools and other county office of education administrators, and representatives of public postsecondary educational institutions, the California State Facilitator Project of the National Diffusion Network, and business and industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33322.

The State Board of Education may authorize the funding of any proposal of a school district, county office of education, public postsecondary educational institution, or other public educational agency for the development of an educational program, where the board determines that the proposal does all of the following:

(a) Provides an effective, cost-effective solution to a current or anticipated statewide educational need in public elementary or secondary schools.

(b) Demonstrates that teachers, and experts in the subject matter of the proposal, collaborated in the development of the proposal.

(c) Contains a professional development component that maximizes teacher commitment and integration of the program into the existing instructional program.

(d) Contains a method of evaluating resulting changes in teaching, pupil performance, and the instructional program, as appropriate.

(e) Provides for development and evaluation of the proposal in collaboration with postsecondary educational institutions and other educational agency resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33323.

The State Board of Education, upon review of the recommendation of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, shall validate, as an exemplary educational project, each project developed by the State Department of Education, a school district, county office of education, or public postsecondary educational institution that it determines to meet the following criteria, whether or not the project was developed pursuant to state funding provided under Section 33322:

(a) The project accomplishes the objectives set forth in Section 33322.

(b) The project contains a plan for the statewide dissemination of the program, to be coordinated with state, regional, and school district staff and program service providers, including, but not limited to, postsecondary educational institutions.

(c) Without any increase in state costs, the project may be adopted by other school districts or county offices of education, as appropriate, with a reasonable probability of accomplishing the objectives realized in the original educational setting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33324.

(a) The State Department of Education shall annually disseminate to each school district, county office of education, resource agency or consortium as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 44680) of Chapter 3.1 of Part 25, and other public educational entity, as appropriate, information regarding effective educational projects and programs developed and validated pursuant to this article, in addition to projects included in the National Diffusion Network. 

(b) The California State Facilitator Project, county offices of education, and other regional educational agencies are encouraged to assist in the dissemination of information regarding effective educational programs.

(c) The State Board of Education, upon review of the recommendation of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, may authorize funds for any proposal of a school district or county office of education for the adoption of an effective educational project, in an amount not exceeding the initial start-up costs of the project, where the board determines that the proposal does all of the following:

(1) Establishes a local need for the adoption or adaptation of the project.

(2) Contains a plan that evidences the commitment of resources necessary to implement the adoption of the project and that coordinates the project with existing educational programs. In the case of a school, that plan should be articulated with the school district plan.

(3) Contains a method of evaluating resulting changes in teaching, pupil performance, and the instructional program.

(4) Has been validated pursuant to Section 33323.

(d) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may assist in the implementation of projects adopted pursuant to subdivision (b), either by the department or pursuant to Section 33326.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

33325.

All proposals submitted to the State Board of Education for funding pursuant to Section 33322 or 33324, or for validation pursuant to Section 33323, shall be evaluated by the State Department of Education, in consultation with school districts, county offices of education, and other appropriate public and private nonprofit educational agencies. Based on those evaluations, the department shall submit its recommendations to the board concerning the funding or, as appropriate, the validation of each proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33326.

The State Board of Education, upon review of the recommendation of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, may authorize funding for any proposal of a county office of education, postsecondary educational institution, consortium of local educational agencies, the National Diffusion Network State Facilitator, the State Department of Education, or other appropriate educational entity to provide assistance, pursuant to this article, in the development, implementation, evaluation, dissemination, or adoption of an exemplary educational project. This assistance may include, but is not limited to, the implementation of professional development activities and the coordination of services with other educational agencies, programs, resources, and professional development providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33327.

(a) The State Department of Education, in performing the identification, development, evaluation, dissemination, or adoption of projects and practices under any state or federal categorical education program, shall perform those functions in accordance with the procedure set forth in this article, as feasible and to the extent authorized by law.

(b) To the extent authorized by law, the department shall apply the funding made available under each of those categorical education programs for the functions described in subdivision (a) to the costs of performing those functions in the manner directed by that subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1636, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

33328.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to evaluate the effectiveness of programs developed for English learners subsequent to Proposition 227 in order to ensure that only programs successful in teaching pupils English and allowing them to meet content standards are adopted by districts. After the results of the evaluation and the dissemination of accurate information on effective programs, a foundation will exist upon which to hold school districts accountable for the program choices made and the subsequent results. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the evaluation identify any necessary changes in law to promote programs that can document success and to allow those programs to continue or expand.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in consultation with the State Board of Education, shall convene a working group for the purpose of selecting a contractor, on a competitive basis, to conduct an independent evaluation of the effects of the implementation of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 300) of Part 1 (Proposition 227) on the education of pupils attending kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in California public schools. The working group shall be comprised of representatives of the Governor, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education, the Assembly Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education, the Assembly Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and other interested parties selected by the working group. The evaluation shall be rigorous and shall consider the long-term effects of programs upon pupils. The evaluation shall consider supplemental instruction programs for English learners in grades 4 to 8, inclusive, established pursuant to the English Language Acquisition Program (Ch. 4 (commencing with Sec. 400) Pt. 1) enacted pursuant to Chapter 71 of the Statutes of 1999. The contract shall provide for two interim reports and one final report.

(c) (1) The first interim report shall set benchmarks, survey program methods, and select samples for long-term study. The first interim report shall include, but shall not be limited to, samples regarding rural, suburban, and urban, school districts and programs in which any of the following conditions exist:

(A) Pupils have obtained waivers and are receiving a portion of their instruction in their primary language.

(B) Pupils are in structured or sheltered English immersion.

(C) Pupils who are English learners are placed in an English language mainstream classroom and are receiving no special services.

(2) The second interim report shall present comparisons of student performance, shall analyze the preliminary effects of Proposition 227 and shall make preliminary findings and recommendations regarding how a school district may modify its implementation of Proposition 227 to improve pupils’ academic achievement and acquisition of the English language. 

(3) The interim reports shall also contain preliminary findings and recommendations, if any, regarding modifications and revisions to Proposition 227 that are necessary to facilitate implementation in a way that will maximize academic achievement and the acquisition of the English language. 

(4) The first interim report shall be delivered to the Governor and the Legislature on or before October 1, 2000. The second interim report shall be delivered to the Governor and the Legislature on or before May 17, 2002.

(d) The final report shall present results from sample programs that detail achievement data and do all of the following:

(1) Identify programs that are effective in teaching pupils the English language.

(2) Identify curriculums for limited-English-speaking pupils that are effective in enabling these pupils to meet state and district standards.

(3) Compare program benefits, and detail any unintended consequences.

(4) Identify programs, if any, that are not effective in teaching pupils the English language.

(5) Identify curriculums, if any, for limited-English-speaking pupils that are not effective in enabling these pupils to meet state and district standards.

(e) The final report shall be delivered to the Governor and the Legislature on or before October 1, 2005.

(f) This section shall be implemented only if funds are appropriated for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

33328.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer, from the input it receives, how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(2) “Educator” means a certificated or classified employee of a local educational agency or charter school.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district or county office of education.

(b) The Superintendent shall convene a
 working group for all of the following purposes:

(1) Developing guidance on the safe and effective use of artificial intelligence in ways that benefit, and do not harm, pupils and educators.

(2) Developing a model policy, reflecting available research, for local educational agencies and charter schools regarding the safe and effective use of artificial intelligence in ways that benefit, and do not negatively impact, educational quality, pupil critical thinking and writing skills, creativity, and the essential work of educators.

(3) Identifying other ways in which the state can support educators in developing and sharing effective practices involving artificial intelligence that minimize risk and maximize benefits to pupils and educators.

(c) (1) The working group shall include all of the following:

(A) Current, credentialed public school teachers serving in elementary and secondary teaching positions.

(B) Classified public school staff.

(C) Schoolsite administrators.

(D) School district or county office of education administrators.
